Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1095.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-418 of Title 14A, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Interchange transaction fee” means the same as the term is


defined in 15 U.S.C., Section 1693o-2; and


2. “Network fee” means the same as the term is defined in 15


U.S.C., Section 1693o-2.


B. No interchange transaction fee or network fee shall be


charged to a merchant for the following credit card transactions or


portion of transactions:



Req. No. 385 Page 1


1. The transaction or portion of the transaction that pays


sales tax, excise tax, and customer tips; and


2. The transaction or portion of the transaction that pays a


donation to any nonprofit organization exempt from taxation pursuant


to the provisions of 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3).


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-385 QD 1/16/2025 3:32:27 PM

































Req. No. 385 Page 2